New York, session 2025-2026, S2258.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading of section 44 of the public service 2 law, as added by chapter 713 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 Utility bills[;] and informational notices. 5 § 2. Section 44 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 6 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 7 8. (a) The commission shall require every utility corporation or muni- 8 cipality who sends an emergency notice to its customers to make avail- 9 able and provide such emergency notice in English and any other prevail- 10 ing language as the commission deems necessary which shall include, but 11 not be limited to, Spanish, Haitian-Creole, Mandarin, Cantonese, Arabic, 12 French, Urdu, Russian, Yiddish, Korean, Bangla, Polish, Italian, Hindi 13 and Tagalog. 14 (b) These emergency notices shall be available and provided in a paper 15 format or transmitted electronically through call, text, and/or email. 16 (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "emergency notices" shall 17 include termination notices, outage notices, and any work notices that 18 would impact services. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04959-02-6